Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB645.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 102. Definitions.--When used in this act the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:* * *"Cursive handwriting." A style of penmanship in which the symbols of the language are written in a conjoined or flowing manner often with the strokes of successive characters joined 12345678910111213141516171819202122 and the angles rounded.* * *Section 2. Section 1511 of the act is amended to read:Section 1511. Subjects of Instruction; Flag Code.--In every elementary public and private school, established and maintained in this Commonwealth, the following subjects shall be taught, in the English language and from English texts: English, including spelling, reading and writing, which shall include cursive handwriting, arithmetic, geography, the history of the United States and of Pennsylvania, civics, including loyalty to the State and National Government, safety education, and the humane treatment of birds and animals, health, including physical education, and physiology, music and art. Other subjects shall be taught in the public elementary schools and also in the public high schools as may be prescribed by the standards of the State Board of Education. All such subjects, except foreign languages, shall be taught in the English language and from English texts: Provided, however, That, at the discretion of the [Superintendent of Public Instruction] Secretary of Education, the teaching of subjects in a language other than English may be permitted as part of a sequence in foreign language study or as part of a bilingual education program if the teaching personnel are properly certified in the subject fields. Each school district shall provide and distribute to each pupil, enrolled in the eighth grade of the public schools, one illustrated copy of the National Flag Code, and shall, from time to time, make available such copies as are necessary for replacements from year to year. It shall be the duty of each teacher in the public schools to make such use of the code as may, from time to time, seem proper.20250SB0645PN0657 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1529. Handwriting Instruction Required.--Each student shall receive cursive handwriting instruction to ensure that students have the ability to read and write cursive handwriting by the end of fifth grade.Section 4. Section 1732-A(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 1732-A. Provisions Applicable to Charter Schools.--(a) Charter schools shall be subject to the following:Sections 108, 110, 111, 321, 325, 326, 327, 431, 436, 443, 510, 518, 527, 708, 736, 737, 738, 739, 740, 741, 752, 753, 755, 771, 776, 777, 808, 809, 810, 1109, 1111, 1112(a), 1301, 1310, 1317, 1317.1, 1317.2, 1318, 1326, 1327, 1327.2, 1329, 1330, 1332, 1333, 1333.1, 1333.2, 1333.3, 1303-A, 1513, 1517, 1518, 1521, 1523, 1529, 1531, 1547, 2014-A, Article XIII-A and Article XIV.Act of July 17, 1961 (P.L.776, No.341), known as the "Pennsylvania Fair Educational Opportunities Act."Act of July 19, 1965 (P.L.215, No.116), entitled "An act providing for the use of eye protective devices by persons engaged in hazardous activities or exposed to known dangers in schools, colleges and universities."Section 4 of the act of January 25, 1966 (1965 P.L.1546, No.541), entitled "An act providing scholarships and providing funds to secure Federal funds for qualified students of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania who need financial assistance to attend postsecondary institutions of higher learning, making an appropriation, and providing for the administration of this act."Act of July 12, 1972 (P.L.765, No.181), entitled "An act relating to drugs and alcohol and their abuse, providing for 20250SB0645PN0657 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 projects and programs and grants to educational agencies, other public or private agencies, institutions or organizations."Act of December 15, 1986 (P.L.1595, No.175), known as the "Antihazing Law."* * *Section 5. Section 1749-A(a)(1) of the act, reenacted and amended October 31, 2024 (P.L.1129, No.135), is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:Section 1749-A. Applicability of other provisions of this act and of other acts and regulations.(a) General requirements.--Cyber charter schools shall be subject to the following:(1) The following:* * *(liii.1) Section 1529.* * *Section 6. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025.20250SB0645PN0657 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617